Hawaii statutes.
[§11-325] When an individual may not
serve as a committee officer. No candidate committee or noncandidate
committee that supports or opposes a candidate shall have an officer who serves
as an officer on any other candidate committee or noncandidate committee that
supports or opposes the same candidate. [L 2010, c 211, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next